North Dakota, session 69, HB1360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-66-01. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Accused individual" means a lobbyist, public official, candidate for public office,
political committee, or contributor who is alleged to have violated article XIV of the
Constitution of North Dakota, this chapter, or another law or rule regarding
transparency, corruption, elections, or lobbying.
2. "Complainant" means an individual who, in writing or verbally, submits a complaint to
the commission and is:
a. A North Dakota resident;
b. Subject to licensing by a state agency or other public official subject to the
jurisdiction of the ethics commission; or
c. A party to a quasi-judicial proceeding before a state agency or other public official
subject to the jurisdiction of the ethics commission.
3. "Complaint" means a verbal or written allegation to the commission that a lobbyist,
public official, candidate for public office, political committee, or contributor has
Page No. 1 25.1095.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
violated article XIV of the Constitution of North Dakota, this chapter, or another law or
rule regarding transparency, corruption, elections, or lobbying.
4. " Alleged violation " means a formal written allegation issued by a majority vote of the
commission, which alleges a regulated individual may have engaged in an ethical
violation.
2. " Enforcement action " means an investigation and proceeding before the commission
under section 3 of article XIV of the Constitution of North Dakota regarding an alleged
violation by a regulated individual.
3. " Ethical violation " means a violation of article XIV of the Constitution of North Dakota ,
chapter 54 - 66, or another law or rule regarding transparency, corruption, elections, or
lobbying by a regulated individual.
4. "Ethics commission" or "commission" means the North Dakota ethics commission
established by article XIV of the Constitution of North Dakota.
5. " Final commission order " means a written order issued by a majority vote of the
commission, which finds an ethical violation and:
a. The time to file a petition for rehearing before the commission has expired;
b. The commission has denied a petition for rehearing; or
c. The commission has affirmed the finding of an ethical violation after rehearing.
5.6. "Gift" means any item, service, or thing of value not given in exchange for fair market
consideration including travel and recreation, except:
a. Purely informational material;
b. A campaign contribution; and
c. An item, service, or thing of value given under conditions that do not raise ethical
concerns, as set forth in rules adopted by the ethics commission, to advance
opportunities for state residents to meet with public officials in educational and
social settings in the state.
6.7. "Influence state government action" means promoting or opposing the adoption of a
rule by an administrative agency or the commission under chapter 28-32.
7.8. "Lobby" means an activity listed in subsection 1 of section 54-05.1-02.
8.9. "Lobbyist" means an individual required to register under section 54-05.1-03.
Page No. 2 25.1095.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
9.10. "Public official" means an elected or appointed official of the state's executive or
legislative branch, members of the commission, members of the governor's cabinet,
and employees of the legislative branch.
10. "Receives the complaint" means one or more members of the commission learn of the
complaint.
11. " Regulated individua l " means a lobbyist, public official, candidate for public office ,
political committee, or contributor.
12. " Relevant information " means an assertion provided to the commission that a
regulated individual engaged in an ethical violation.
13. " Responden t " means a regulated individual who is the subject of an alleged violation .
11.14. "Ultimate and true source" means the person that knowingly contributed over two
hundred dollars solely to lobby or influence state government action.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 54-66-04 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. Unless the complaintenforcement action at issue has resulted in the imposition of a
penalty or referral for enforcement under section 54-66-09a final commission order
and a court affirmed the final commission order, if appealed, any portion of a meeting
during which commission members discuss complaints, informal resolutions, attempts
to informally resolve complaints, investigations, or referrals under this chapter, the
identity of an accused individual or complainant, or any other matter arising from a
complaint arean enforcement action is a closed meetingsmeeting.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-66-05. Making a complaint - Summary dismissal of complaintRules of procedure.
1. A complaint may be made to the commission orally or in writing. If a complainant does
not provide the complainant's name, address, and telephone number with the
complaint, the ethics commission may not investigate or take other action regarding
the complaint. The commission shall summarize each oral complaint in writing unless
the complaint must be disregarded under this section.
2. Upon receipt of a complaint or information regarding a violation, the commission may
summarily dismiss the complaint or decline to proceed with a complaint if the alleged
Page No. 3 25.1095.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
violation does not fall within the commission's jurisdiction, is insufficient to identify a
possible violation, or fails to comply with rules adopted by the commission. In lieu of
summary dismissal, the commission may refer the matter under section 54-66-08.
3. If a complainant would like the complainant's identity to remain confidential, the
commission may not release the complainant's name and address to the accused
individual without the authorization of the complainant. If the complainant does not
authorize release of the complainant's name and address to the accused individual,
the statement of the complainant may not be used as evidence of a violation.
4. If the commission receives an anonymous complaint that contains documentary or real
evidence of possible criminal conduct, the commission may refer the matter to the
appropriate law enforcement agency as provided under section 54-66-08, and may not
otherwise divulge the documentary or real evidence.The commission may adopt rules
of pleading, practice, and procedure the commission deems necessary for an
enforcement action.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-66-08. Investigations - Referrals.
1. If an informal resolution is not reached under section 54-66-07, the ethics commission
may:
a. Dismiss the complaint;
b. Require ethics commission staff to investigate the allegations in the complaint; or
c. Engage an outside investigator to investigate allegations in the complaint.
2. If the commission believes a complaint contains allegations of criminal conduct, the
matter must be coordinated with the appropriate law enforcement agency with
jurisdiction over the offense. If the law enforcement agency agrees to accept a referral
for possible criminal prosecution, the commission may not take further action on the
complaint until the law enforcement agency informs the commission law enforcement
proceedings regarding the complaint are complete. If the law enforcement agency
declines a referral for prosecution, the commission may investigate the complaint
under the rules adopted by the commission. Unless the agency accepting the referral
Page No. 4 25.1095.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
objects, the commission shall inform the complainant and respondent as soon as
reasonably possible of a referral and the nature of the referred allegations.
3. The commission may require the testimony of a witness or the production of a book,
record, document, data, or other object at any of the commission's investigator interviews or
proceedings held in connection with the investigation of a complaintan enforcement action.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-66-10. Appeals.
An accused individualA respondent may appeal a finding of the ethicsfinal commission
order to the district court of the county where the accused individualrespondent resides, the
district court in Burleigh County, or a district court of the county in which a substantial part of the
subject matter of the alleged violation occurred within thirty days after notice of the final
commission order.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-66-12. Confidential information.
1. The following information is a confidential record as defined in section 44-04-17.1,
unless the commission has determined the accused individual violated article XIV of
the Constitution of North Dakota, this chapter, or another law or rule regarding
transparency, corruption, elections, or lobbying,issued a final commission order and a
court affirmed the determinationfinal commission order, if appealed, except the
information may be disclosed as required by law or as necessary to conduct an
investigation arising from a complaintduring an enforcement action:
a. Relevant information submitted to the commission by an individual;
b. Information prepared for the commission to determine whether to issue an
alleged violation;
c. Information revealing the contents of a complaintan alleged violation;
b.d. Information that reasonably may be used to identify an accused individuala
respondent; and
c.e. Information relating to or created as part of an investigation of a complaintan
alleged violation.
Page No. 5 25.1095.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. If a complaint is informally resolved under section 54-66-07, the following information
is a confidential record as defined in section 44-04-17.1:
a. Information revealing the contents of the complaint;
b. Information that reasonably may be used to identify the accused individual;
c. Information relating to or created as part of the process leading to the informal
resolution; and
d. Information revealing the informal resolution.
3. Information that reasonably may be used to identify the complainantan individual who
provides relevant information to the commission is confidential unless the
complainantindividual waives confidentiality, authorizes its disclosure, or divulges
information that reasonably would identify the complainantindividual. Information,
including evidence under consideration by the investigator or commission, deemed
confidential under this subsection may be disclosed as required by law or as
necessary to conduct an investigation arising from a complaint to include disclosure of
evidence being considered to an accused individuala respondent.
4.3. The information deemed confidential in subsectionssubsection 1 and 2 may be
disclosed by the ethicsindividual who provides relevant information to the commission,
the respondent, and the commission if the accused individualrespondent agrees to the
disclosure.
4. The commission may disclose the information deemed confidential in subsection 1 to
an entity with appropriate enforcement authority.
SECTION 7. REPEAL. Sections 54-66-06, 54-66-07, and 54-66-09 of the North Dakota
Century Code are repealed.
Page No. 6 25.1095.01000